Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2308.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COLLEGE POSSIBLE.new text end new text begin (a) $600,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $600,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of higher education for immediate transfer to College Possible to support programming focused on college admission and college graduation for low-income students through an intensive curriculum of coaching and support at both the high school and postsecondary levels. new text end new text begin (b) This appropriation must be used by College Possible only for programs supporting students who are residents of Minnesota and attending colleges or universities within Minnesota. new text end new text begin (c) By February 1 each fiscal year in which College Possible receives an appropriation, College Possible must report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over higher education and kindergarten through grade 12 education on activities funded by this appropriation. The report must include but is not limited to information about the expansion of College Possible in Minnesota, the number of College Possible coaches hired, the expansion within existing partner high schools, the expansion of high school partnerships, the number of high school and college students served, the total hours of community service by high school and college students, and a list of communities and organizations benefiting from student service hours. new text end